District of Columbia statutes.
1-622.15

Disability income protection.

The Mayor shall establish a disability income program to include short- and long-term disability insurance which shall provide coverage for non-job-related injuries and illnesses.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2215
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(w)(2), 45 DCR 2464

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-623.15.

Construction of Law

Construction of Law 12-124

Section 301 of D.C. Law 12-124 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (Public Law 105-33; 111 Stat. 712), except that § 47-395.04(b)(3) is expressly superseded. Further, nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of § 47-391.01 et seq. or of § 164 of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1998, approved November 19, 1997 (Public Law 105-100; 111 Stat. 2160).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of § 101 of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998.